New York, session 2025-2026, S9451.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 Katie Adamek, a tier V member of the New York state and local employees' 3 retirement system employed by the Schenectady City School District 4 beginning November 23, 2009 and who, through no fault of her own, did 5 not become a member of the New York state and local employees' retire- 6 ment system on November 23, 2009 when she became eligible for membership 7 in such system, shall be deemed to have a date of membership with the 8 New York state and local employees' retirement system of November 23, 9 2009 if she shall file an application therefor with the state comp- 10 troller within one year of the effective date of this act. Upon the 11 receipt of such application, Katie Adamek shall be granted tier IV 12 status in the New York state and local employees' retirement system and 13 shall be eligible for all the rights and benefits thereof. 14 § 2. All past service costs of implementing the provisions of this act 15 shall be borne by Schenectady City School District, and there shall be 16 no refund of member contributions to Katie Adamek. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50: This bill would grant Tier 4 status in the New York State and Local Employees' Retirement System (NYSLERS) to Katie Adamek, a current Tier 5 member employed by the Schenectady City School District, by changing their date of membership to November 23, 2009, their date of first employment with the Schenectady City School District. There will be no refund of member contributions. We estimate that the Schenectady City School District's annual contributions will increase $2,300 beginning FYE 2027. Annual costs will vary as the billing rates and salary of Katie Adamek change. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13754-03-6 S. 9451 2 In addition, there will be an immediate past service cost of $87,000 borne by the Schenectady City School District as a one-time payment. This cost assumes that payment will be made on February 1, 2027. Summary of relevant resources: Membership data as of March 31, 2025 was used to measure the impact of the bill, the same data used in the Actuarial Valuations dated April 1, 2025. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2025 Report of the Actuary and the 2025 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2025 Annual Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The fair value of assets and GASB disclosures can be found in the 2025 Financial Statements and Supplementary Information. Assumptions, demographics, and other considerations may have been modified to better reflect specific provisions of any proposed benefit change(s). This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability of the bill, nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the profes- sional judgment of an attorney. This estimate, dated February 10, 2026, and intended for use only during the 2026 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note Number 2026-124. As Chief Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System (NYSLRS), I, Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with applicable Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actu- aries, of which I am a member. I am a member of NYSLRS but do not believe it impairs my objectivity.